Washington statutes.
RCW 7.56.050

Notice—Pleadings—Proceedings.

Whenever an information is filed, a notice signed by the relator shall be served and returned, as in other actions. The defendant shall appear and answer, or suffer default, and subsequent proceeding be had as in other cases.

[Code 1881 s 706; 1877 p 144 s 710; 1854 p 217 s 472; RRS s 1038.]